Utah statutes.
13-22-9.   Professional fund raiser's or fund raising counsel's or
consultant's permit.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person or entity to act as a professional fund
raiser or professional fund raising counsel or consultant, whether or not
representing an organization exempt from registration under Section 13-22-8,
without first obtaining a permit from the division by complying with all of
the following application requirements:
(a)  pay an application fee as determined under Section 63J-1-504; and
(b)  submit a written application, verified under oath, on a form approved by
the division that includes:
(i)  the applicant's name, address, telephone number, facsimile number, if
any;
(ii)  the name and address of any organization or person controlled by,
controlling, or affiliated with the applicant;
(iii)  the applicant's business, occupation, or employment for the three-year
period immediately preceding the date of the application;
(iv)  whether it is an individual, joint venture, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, association, or other entity;
(v)  the names and residence addresses of any officer or director of the
applicant;
(vi)  the name and address of the registered agent for service of process and
a consent to service of process;
(vii)  if a professional fund raiser:
(A)  the purpose of the solicitation and use of the contributions to be
solicited;
(B)  the method by which the solicitation will be conducted and the projected
length of time it is to be conducted;
(C)  the anticipated expenses of the solicitation, including all commissions,
costs of collection, salaries, and any other items;
(D)  a statement of what percentage of the contributions collected as a result
of the solicitation are projected to remain available to the charitable
organization declared in the application, including a satisfactory statement
of the factual basis for the projected percentage and projected anticipated
revenues provided to the charitable organization, and if a flat fee is
charged, documentation to support the reasonableness of the flat fee; and
(E)  a statement of total contributions collected or received by the
professional fund raiser within the calendar year immediately preceding the
date of the application, including a description of the expenditures made from
or the use made of the contributions;
(viii)  if a professional fund raising counsel or consultant:
(A)  the purpose of the plan, management, advise, counsel or preparation of
materials for, or respect to the solicitation and use of the contributions
solicited;
(B)  the method by which the plan, management, advise, counsel, or preparation
of materials for, or respect to the solicitation will be organized or
coordinated and the projected length of time of the solicitation;
(C)  the anticipated expenses of the plan, management, advise, counsel, or
preparation of materials for, or respect to the solicitation, including all
commissions, costs of collection, salaries, and any other items;
(D)  a statement of total fees to be earned or received from the charitable
organization declared in the application, and what percentage of the
contributions collected as a result of the plan, management, advise, counsel,
or preparation of materials for, or respect to the solicitation are projected
after deducting the total fees to be earned or received remain available to
the charitable organization declared in the application, including a
satisfactory statement of the factual basis for the projected percentage and
projected anticipated revenues provided to the charitable organization, and if
a flat fee is charged, documentation to support the reasonableness of such
flat fee; and
(E)  a statement of total net fees earned or received within the calendar year
immediately preceding the date of the application, including a description of
the expenditures made from or the use of the net earned or received fees in
the planning, management, advising, counseling, or preparation of materials
for, or respect to the solicitation and use of the contributions solicited for
the charitable organization;
(ix)  disclosure of any injunction, judgment, or administrative order against
the applicant or the applicant's conviction of any crime involving moral
turpitude;
(x)  a copy of any written agreements with any charitable organization;
(xi)  the disclosure of any injunction, judgment, or administrative order or
conviction of any crime involving moral turpitude with respect to any officer,
director, manager, operator, or principal of the applicant;
(xii)  a copy of all agreements to which the applicant is, or proposes to be,
a party regarding the use of proceeds;
(xiii)  an acknowledgment that fund raising in the state will not commence
until both the professional fund raiser or professional fund raising counsel
or consultant and the charity, its parent foundation, if any, are registered
and in compliance with this chapter; and
(xiv)  any additional information the division may require by rule.
(2)  If any information contained in the application for a permit becomes
incorrect or incomplete, the applicant or registrant shall, within 30 days
after the information becomes incorrect or incomplete, correct the application
or file the complete information required by the division.
(3)  In addition to the permit fee, an applicant failing to file a permit
application or renewal by the due date or filing an incomplete permit
application or renewal shall pay an additional fee of $25 for each month or
part of a month after the date on which the permit application or renewal were
due to be filed.
